Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-948
University of Nebraska; health programs; sole responsibility; exception.

The University of Nebraska shall have sole responsibility for baccalaureate, first professional, master's, and doctoral programs in the health professions to include medicine, dentistry, pharmacy, nursing, and the allied health professions, with the exception of the baccalaureate programs in the allied health professions established at the state colleges prior to June 1, 1977.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 32;

Laws 1981, LB 320, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 890, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 94.